mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX N1 Y 63
SFX N1 0 гийн [ойиуярхчцль][оуяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 гийнд/01 [ойиуярхчцль][оуяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 гийнх/050871 [ойиуярхчцль][оуяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 г/01 [ойиуярхчць][оуйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 [ойиуярхчцль][оуйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 [ойиуярхчцль][оуйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкьп]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчхгкьп]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ид/01 [жчш]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ийг/01 [гкжчш]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ийн [гкжчш]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ийнд/01 [гкжчш]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ийнх/050871 [гкжчш]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 йг/01 [^ойиуяю]и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 йн [^ойиуюя]и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 йнд/01 [^ойиуяю]и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 йнх/050871 [^ойиуяю]и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 н [оиуяеюё]й	07CASE
SFX N1 0 нд/01 [оиуяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N1 0 нх/050871 [оиуяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N1 0 од [^оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 доо [^оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 од [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 доо [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 оо [^ойиуьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 оор/01 [^ойиуьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 оос/01 [^ойиуьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 о [^ойиуярхчцль][оияюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ор/01 [^ойиуярхчцль][ояюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ос/01 [^ойиуярхчцль][ояюеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ор/01 и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ос/01 и	07CASE
SFX N1 0 т [оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 тоо [оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 од [^оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 доо [^оуяюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N1 0 т [гк]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 тоо [гк]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ы н	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ыг/01 [^оийуьгкжчшяеёю]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ыд/01 н	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ын [^ойиуьнгкжчшяеёю]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ынд/01 [^ойиуьнгкжчшяеёю]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ынх/050871 [^оийуьнгкжчшяеё]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 ых/050871 н	07CASE
SFX N1 о ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о	07CASE
SFX N1 о ын [^ойиуярхжчш]о	07CASE
SFX N1 о ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о	07CASE
SFX N1 о ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]о	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ид/01 [дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ийг/01 ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ийн ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ийнд/01 ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ийнх/050871 ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь ио ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь иор/01 ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь иос/01 ь	07CASE
SFX N1 ь итой/71 [дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^ь]	07CASE
SFX N1 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N2 Y 49
SFX N2 0 гийн [өэйиүерхчцль][өүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 гийнд/02 [өэйиүерхчцль][өүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 гийнх/060872 [өэйиүерхчцль][өүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 г/02 [өэйиүерхчць][өүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 гөөр/02 [өэйиүерхчцль][өүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 гөөс/02 [өэйиүерхчцль][өүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкп]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 дөө [^дтжзсшцчхгкп]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ид/02 [жчш]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ий н	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийг/02 [^өэийүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийд/02 н	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийн [^өэйиүняюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийнд/02 [^өэйиүняюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийнх/060872 [^өэийүняюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ийх/060872 н	07CASE
SFX N2 0 йг/02 [^өэйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 йн [^өэйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 йнд/02 [^өэйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 йнх/060872 [^өэйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 н [өэиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N2 0 нд/02 [өэиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N2 0 нх/060872 [өэиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өд [^өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 дөө [^өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өд [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 дөө [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өө [^өэйиүюе]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өөр/02 [^өэйиүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өөс/02 [^өэйиүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 ө [^өэйиүерхчцль][иөяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өр/02 [^өэйиүерхчцль][өяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өс/02 [^өэйиүерхчцль][өяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өр/02 и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өс/02 и	07CASE
SFX N2 0 т [өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 төө [өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 өд [^өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 дөө [^өэүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N2 0 т [гк]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 төө [гк]	07CASE
SFX N2 ө ийг/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө	07CASE
SFX N2 ө ийн [^өэйиүерх]ө	07CASE
SFX N2 ө ийнд/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө	07CASE
SFX N2 ө ийнх/060872 [^өэйиүерх]ө	07CASE
SFX N2 ь итэй/72 [дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^ь]	07CASE
SFX N2 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N3 Y 59
SFX N3 0 гийн [эйиүерхчцль][эүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 гийнд/03 [эйиүерхчцль][эүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 гийнх/070873 [эйиүерхчцль][эүяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 г/03 [эйиүерхчцль][эүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 гээр/03 [эйиүерхчцль][эүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 гээс/03 [эйиүерхчцль][эүйяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N3 0 дээ [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N3 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкьп]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 дээ [^дтжзсшцчхгкьп]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ид/03 [жчш]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ий н	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийг/03 [^эийүьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийд/03 н	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийн [^эйиүньяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийнд/03 [^эйиүньяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийнх/070873 [^эийүньяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ийх/070873 н	07CASE
SFX N3 0 йг/03 [^эйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 йн [^эйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 йнд/03 [^эйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 йнх/070873 [^эйиүе]и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 н [эиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N3 0 нд/03 [эиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N3 0 нх/070873 [эиүяюеё]й	07CASE
SFX N3 0 т [эүеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 тээ [эүюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эд [^эүюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 дээ [^эүюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 т [гк]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 тээ [гк]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эд [^эүюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 дээ [^эүюеий]с	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эд [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 дээ [дтзцхп]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 э [^эйиүерхчцль][иэяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эр/03 [^эйиүерхчцль][эяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эс/03 [^эйиүерхчцль][эяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эр/03 и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 эс/03 и	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ээ [^эйиүьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ээр/03 [^эйиүьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 ээс/03 [^эйиүьяюеё]	07CASE
SFX N3 э ийг/03 [^эйиүерх]э	07CASE
SFX N3 э ийн [^эйиүеюр]э	07CASE
SFX N3 э ийнд/03 [^эйиүеюрх]э	07CASE
SFX N3 э ийнх/070873 [^эйиүеюрх]э	07CASE
SFX N3 ь иэ ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь иэр/03 ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь иэс/03 ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь ид/03 [дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь ийг/03 ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь ийн ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь ийнд/03 ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь ийнх/070873 ь	07CASE
SFX N3 ь итэй/73 [дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N3 0 тэй/73 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь	07CASE
SFX N3 0 тэй/73 [^ь]	07CASE
SFX N3 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N4 Y 17
SFX N4 0 аа [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 аар/00 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 аас/00 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 г/00 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 гаар/00 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 гаас/00 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 гийн [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 гийнх/040870 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 д [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 даа [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 т [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 таа [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 ыг/00 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 ын [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 ынх/040870 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N4 0 тай/70 .	07CASE
SFX N4 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N5 Y 17
SFX N5 0 гийн [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 гийнх/050871 [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 г/01 [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 гоор/01 [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 гоос/01 [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 д [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 доо [ноаэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 оо [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 оор/01 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 оос/01 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 т [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 тоо [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 ыг/01 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 ын [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 ынх/050871 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N5 0 той/71 .	07CASE
SFX N5 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N6 Y 17
SFX N6 0 гийн [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 гийнх/060872 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 г/02 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 гөөр/02 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 гөөс/02 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 д [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 дөө [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 ийг/02 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 ийн [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 ийнх/060872 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 өө [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 өөр/02 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 өөс/02 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 т [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 төө [вр]	07CASE
SFX N6 0 тэй/72 .	07CASE
SFX N6 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX N7 Y 17
SFX N7 0 гийн [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 гийнх/070873 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 г/03 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 гээр/03 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 гээс/03 [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 д [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 дээ [наоэөуүие]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ийг/03 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ийн [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ийнх/070873 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 т [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 тээ [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ээ [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ээр/03 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 ээс/03 [вр]	07CASE
SFX N7 0 тэй/73 .	07CASE
SFX N7 0 гүй/73 .	07CASE

SFX 0N Y 54
SFX 0N 0 гийнхан/0408 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнханд/00 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнхнаар/00 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнхнаас/00 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнхны [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнхныг/00 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 гийнхных/040870 [иауях][ау]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхан/0408 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нханд/00 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхнаар/00 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхнаас/00 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхны й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхныг/00 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 нхных/040870 й	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 йнхан/0408 и	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 йнханд/00 и	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 йнхнаар/00 и	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 йнхнаас/00 и	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 йнхных/040870 и	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхан/0408 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынханд/00 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхнаар/00 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхнаас/00 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхны [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхныг/00 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ынхных/040870 [^ауийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхан/0408 н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыханд/00 н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхнаар/00 н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхнаас/00 н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхны н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхныг/00 н	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ыхных/040870 н	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхан/0408 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынханд/00 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхнаар/00 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхнаас/00 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхны [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхныг/00 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N а ынхных/040870 [^ахя]а	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхан/0408 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнханд/00 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхнаар/00 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхнаас/00 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхны ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхныг/00 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N ь ийнхных/040870 ь	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхан/0408 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнханд/00 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхнаар/00 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхнаас/00 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхны [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхныг/00 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 0N 0 ийнхных/040870 [гжчш]	+POSS

SFX 1N Y 54
SFX 1N 0 гийнхноор/01 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхноос/01 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхны [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхныг/01 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхных/050871 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхон/0508 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 гийнхонд/01 [иоуях][оу]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхноор/01 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхноос/01 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхны й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхныг/01 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхных/050871 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхон/0508 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 нхонд/01 й	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 йнхноор/01 и	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 йнхноос/01 и	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 йнхных/050871 и	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 йнхон/0508 и	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 йнхонд/01 и	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхноор/01 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхноос/01 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхны [^оуйньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхныг/01 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхных/050871 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхон/0508 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ынхонд/01 [^оуийньгжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхноор/01 н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхноос/01 н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхны н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхныг/01 н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхных/050871 н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхон/0508 н	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ыхонд/01 н	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхноор/01 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхноос/01 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхны [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхныг/01 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхных/050871 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхон/0508 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N о ынхонд/01 [^охё]о	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхноор/01 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхноос/01 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхны ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхныг/01 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхных/050871 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхон/0508 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N ь ийнхонд/01 ь	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхон/0508 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхонд/01 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхноор/01 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхноос/01 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхныг/01 [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхны [гжчш]	+POSS
SFX 1N 0 ийнхных/050871 [гжчш]	+POSS
